Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-604
Chief of police; riots; subject to order of mayor; arrest powers.

The chief of police shall be subject to the orders of the mayor in the suppression of riots and tumultuous disturbances and breaches of the peace. He or she may pursue and arrest any person fleeing from justice in any part of the state and shall forthwith bring all persons by him or her arrested before the county court for trial or examination. He or she may receive and execute any proper authority for the arrest and detention of criminals fleeing or escaping from other places or states.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. V, § 4, p. 496;

C.S.1922, § 3685;

C.S.1929, § 14-604;

R.S.1943, § 14-604;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 98;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 3.

This section does not apply to proceedings instituted by complaint for violation of state statutes. Koop v. City of Omaha, 173 Neb. 633, 114 N.W.2d 380 (1962).

It is the duty of the chief of police to interfere for the prevention of public violation of the law, and this duty may be enforced by mandamus. Moores v. State ex rel. Dunn, 71 Neb. 522, 99 N.W. 249 (1904).